Utah statutes.
16-16-1407.   Cancellation of certificate of authority -- Effect of failure
to have certificate.
(1)  To cancel its certificate of authority, a foreign cooperative shall
deliver to the division for filing a notice of cancellation.  The certificate
is canceled when the notice becomes effective under Section 16-16-203.
(2)  A foreign cooperative transacting business in this state may not maintain
an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of
authority.
(3)  The failure of a foreign cooperative to have a certificate of authority
does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign cooperative
or prevent the foreign cooperative from defending an action or proceeding in
this state.
(4)  A member of a foreign cooperative is not liable for the obligations of
the foreign cooperative solely by reason of the foreign cooperative's having
transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority.
(5)  If a foreign cooperative transacts business in this state without a
certificate of authority or cancels its certificate, it appoints the division
as its agent for service of process for an action arising out of the
transaction of business in this state.
